Utah statutes.
53A-26a-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Advisory board" or "board" means the Interpreters Certification Board created in Section 53A-26a-201.

(2)  "Certified interpreter" means a person who is certified as meeting the certification requirements of this chapter.

(3)  "Hearing impaired" means a hearing loss which:

(a)  necessitates the visual acquisition of language; or

(b)  adversely affects the acquisition of language but which does not preclude the auditory acquisition of language.

(4)  "Interpreter services" means those services provided for payment by an individual holding one's self out to be a certified interpreter to facilitate effective communication between hearing and hearing impaired persons.



Enacted by Chapter 306, 1994 General Session

